Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.600.070

State honors awards program—Rules.

The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules for the establishment and administration of the Washington state honors awards program. The rules shall establish: (1) The test or tests of general achievement that are used to measure verbal and quantitative achievement, (2) academic subject performance levels, (3) timelines for participating school districts to notify students of the opportunity to participate, (4) procedures for the administration of the program, and (5) the procedures for providing the appropriate honors award designation.

[ 1991 c 116 s 23; 1985 c 62 s 3. Formerly RCW 28A.03.444.]